Nebraska, session 109, LB644.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 13 of this act shall be known and may be cited
as the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act.
Sec. 2. The purpose of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent
Registration Act is to provide public transparency for the political and
propaganda activities and influence operations of agents of adversary nations
and foreign terror organizations in Nebraska.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent
Registration Act:
(1) Adversary nation means those countries listed in 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as
such regulation existed on April 1, 2025;
(2)(a) Agent of a foreign principal means:
(i) Any person who directly, or through any other person, within the State
of Nebraska, engages in covered activities and who acts:
(A) As an agent, representative, employee, or servant, of a foreign
principal; or
(B) In any other capacity at the order or request or under the direction
or control, of a foreign principal or of a person, any of whose activities are
directly or indirectly supervised, directed, controlled, financed, or
subsidized in whole or in part by, a foreign principal; or
(ii) Any person who agrees, consents, assumes, or purports to act as, or
who is or purports to be, whether or not pursuant to a contractual
relationship, an agent of a foreign principal as defined in subdivision (2)(a)
(i) of this section.
(b) Agent of a foreign principal does not include any media entity, solely
by virtue of any bona fide news or journalistic activities, including the
solicitation or acceptance of advertisements, subscriptions, or other
compensation therefor, so long as:
(i) The media entity is at least eighty percent beneficially owned by
citizens of the United States;
(ii) Any officers and directors of the media entity are citizens of the
United States; and
(iii) The media entity is not owned, directed, supervised, controlled,
subsidized, or financed, and none of its policies are determined by, any
foreign principal or by any agent of a foreign principal required to register
under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act;
(3) Covered activities means:
(a) Engaging in political activities for, or in the interests of, a
foreign principal;
(b) Acting as a public relations counsel, publicity agent, information-
service employee or political consultant for, or in the interests of, a foreign
principal;
(c) Soliciting, collecting, disbursing, or dispensing contributions,
loans, money, or other things of value for, or in the interests of, a foreign
principal; or
(d) Representing the interests of such foreign principal before any agency
or official of this state or a political subdivision of this state;
(4) False statement of material fact includes any of the following with
respect to a registration statement, a supplement to such statement, or any
document filed with or furnished to the Attorney General under the Foreign
Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act:
(a) A false statement of material fact;
(b) An omission of a material fact required to be reported; and
-1-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
(c) An omission of a material fact or copy of a material document
necessary to make the statements made in such statement, supplement, or
document not misleading;
(5) Foreign political party means any organization or any other
combination of individuals in a country other than the United States, or any
unit or branch thereof, having for an aim or purpose, or which is engaged in
any activity devoted in whole or in part to, the establishment, administration,
control, or acquisition of administration or control, of a government of a
foreign country or a subdivision thereof, or the furtherance or influencing of
the political or public interests, policies, or relations of a government of a
foreign country or a subdivision thereof;
(6) Foreign principal means:
(a) A government of a foreign country, any agency or instrumentality of
such government, or a foreign political party;
(b) A person outside of the United States, unless it is established that
such person is an individual and a citizen or permanent resident of and
domiciled within the United States, or that such person is not an individual
and is organized under or created by the laws of the United States or of any
state or other place subject to the jurisdiction of the United States and has
its principal place of business within the United States;
(c) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other
combination of persons organized under the laws of, or having its principal
place of business in, a foreign country;
(d) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other
combination of persons that is at least twenty percent beneficially owned by a
partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of
persons organized under the laws of, or having its principal place of business
in, a foreign country;
(e) Any person that owns or operates in whole or in part an entity
described in subdivision (6)(d) of this section;
(f) Any person that is owned or operated in whole or in part by a person
or entity described in subdivision (6)(a), (b), (c), or (e) of this section; or
(g) A foreign terrorist organization;
(7) Foreign terrorist organization means an organization included on the
United States Department of State's list of designated foreign terrorist
organizations pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1189, as such section existed on April 1,
2025;
(8) Government of a foreign country means any person or group of persons
exercising sovereign de facto or de jure political jurisdiction over any
country, other than the United States, or over any part of such country, and
includes any subdivision of any such group and any group or agency to which
such sovereign de facto or de jure authority or functions are directly or
indirectly delegated. Such term shall include any faction or body of insurgents
within a country assuming to exercise governmental authority whether such
faction or body of insurgents has or has not been recognized by the United
States;
(9) Information service employee means any person who is engaged in
furnishing, disseminating, or publishing accounts, descriptions, information,
or data with respect to the political, industrial, employment, economic,
social, cultural, or other benefits, advantages, facts, or conditions of any
country other than the United States, any government of a foreign country, any
foreign political party, or a partnership, association, corporation,
organization, or other combination of individuals organized under the laws of,
or having its principal place of business in, a foreign country;
(10) Media entity means any:
(a) News or press service or association organized under the laws of the
United States, any state, or any other place subject to the jurisdiction of the
United States;
(b) Newspaper, magazine, periodical, or other publication; or
(c) Website or application that enables users to create and share content
or to participate in social networking;
(11) Owned or operated in whole or in part means that a person has the
power, directly or indirectly, whether or not exercised, to determine, direct,
or decide important matters affecting an entity including through:
(a) The ownership of at least twenty percent of the total outstanding
voting interest in an entity;
(b) Board representation;
(c) The ability to appoint or discharge any board members, officers, or
directors;
(d) Proxy voting, a special share, contractual arrangements, legal
obligations, or formal or informal arrangements to act in concert; or
(e) Any other means;
(12) Person means an individual, a partnership, an association, a
corporation, an organization, or any other entity or combination of
individuals;
(13) Political activities means any activity that the person engaging in
believes will, or that the person intends to, in any way influence any agency
or official of this state or a political subdivision of this state with
reference to formulating, adopting, or changing the domestic or foreign
policies of the United States or of the State of Nebraska with reference to the
political or public interests, policies, or relations of a government of a
foreign country or a foreign political party;
(14) Political consultant means any person who engages in informing or
-2-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
advising any other person with reference to the policies of the State of
Nebraska or the political or public interest, policies, or relations of a
foreign country or of a foreign political party;
(15) Political propaganda means information, especially of a biased or
misleading nature, used to promote the political cause or point of view of an
adversary nation, a foreign terrorist organization, or a political party from
an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization;
(16) Postsecondary educational institution has the same meaning as
postsecondary institution in section 85-2403;
(17) Prints means newspapers, periodicals, books, pamphlets, sheet music,
visiting cards, address cards, printing proofs, engravings, photographs,
pictures, drawings, plans, maps, patterns to be cut out, catalogs,
prospectuses, and advertisements; printed, engraved, lithographed, or
autographed notices of various kinds; and, in general, all impressions or
reproductions obtained on paper or other material assimilable to paper, on
parchment or on cardboard, by means of printing, engraving, lithography,
autography, or any other easily recognizable mechanical process, with the
exception of the copying press, stamps with movable or immovable type, and the
typewriter;
(18) Public relations counsel means any person who engages directly or
indirectly in informing, advising, or in any way representing a principal in
any public relations matter pertaining to political or public interests,
policies, or relations of such principal;
(19) Publicity agent means any person who engages directly or indirectly
in the publication or dissemination of oral, visual, graphic, written, or
pictorial information or matter of any kind, including publication by means of
advertising, books, periodicals, newspapers, lectures, broadcasts, motion
pictures, or otherwise;
(20) Registration statement means the registration statement required to
be filed with the Attorney General under section 4 of this act, and any
supplements to such statement required to be filed under such section, and
includes all documents and papers required to be filed with, or in amendment
to, such statement or supplements, whether attached or incorporated by
reference; and
(21) United States, when used in a geographical sense, means the several
states, the District of Columbia, the territories, the insular possessions, and
all other places now or hereafter subject to the civil or military jurisdiction
of the United States.
Sec. 4. (1) No person shall act as an agent of a foreign principal from
an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization unless such person has
filed with the Attorney General a true and complete registration statement and
supplements to such statement as required by this section or unless such person
is exempt from registration under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent
Registration Act. Except as otherwise provided under the act, every person who
becomes an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign
terrorist organization shall, within ten days thereafter, file with the
Attorney General, in duplicate, a registration statement, under oath on a form
prescribed by the Attorney General. The obligation of such an agent to file a
registration statement shall, after the tenth day of such person becoming such
an agent, continue from day to day, and termination of such status shall not
relieve such agent from the obligation to file a registration statement for the
period during which such agent was an agent of a foreign principal from an
adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization. The registration
statement shall include the following, which shall be regarded as material for
the purposes of this subsection:
(a) The registrant's name, principal business address, and all other
business addresses in the United States or elsewhere, and all residence
addresses, if any;
(b) The status of the registrant, including:
(i) If an individual, such individual's citizenship;
(ii) If a partnership, the name, residence addresses, and citizenship of
each partner and a true and complete copy of its partnership agreement;
(iii) If an association, corporation, organization, or any other
combination of individuals, the name, residence addresses, and citizenship of
each director and officer and of each person performing the functions of a
director or officer and a true and complete copy of its charter, articles of
incorporation, association, constitution, operating agreement, certificate of
organization, articles of organization, and bylaws and any amendments thereto;
and
(iv) A copy of every other instrument or document and a statement of the
terms and conditions of every oral agreement relating to the registrant's
organization, powers, and purposes, and a statement of ownership and control;
(c)(i) A comprehensive statement of the nature of the registrant's
business;
(ii) A complete list of the registrant's employees and a statement of the
nature of the work of each;
(iii) The name and address of every foreign principal from an adversary
nation or a foreign terrorist organization for whom the registrant is acting,
assuming or purporting to act, or has agreed to act;
(iv) The character of the business or other activities of every such
foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization,
and, if any such principal is not an individual, a statement of the ownership
and control of each; and
-3-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
(v) The extent, if any, to which each such foreign principal from an
adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization is supervised, directed,
owned, controlled, financed, or subsidized, in whole or in part, by any
government of a foreign country or foreign political party, or by any other
foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization;
(d)(i) Copies of each written agreement and the terms and conditions of
each oral agreement, including all modifications of such agreements, or, if no
agreement exists, a full statement of all the circumstances, by reason of which
the registrant is an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a
foreign terrorist organization; and
(ii) A comprehensive statement of the nature and method of performance of
each such agreement, and of the existing and proposed activity or activities
engaged in or to be engaged in by the registrant as agent of a foreign
principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization for each
such principal, including a detailed statement of any such activity that is a
political activity;
(e) The nature and amount of any contributions, income, money, or thing of
value that the registrant has received within the preceding one hundred eighty
days from each such foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign
terrorist organization, either as compensation or for disbursement or
otherwise, and the form and time of each such payment and from whom received;
(f)(i) A detailed statement of every activity that the registrant is
performing, assuming or purporting to perform, directing others to perform, or
has agreed to perform for the registrant or for any person other than a foreign
principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization and that
requires registration under this section, including a detailed statement of any
such activity that is a political activity;
(ii) The name, business, and residence addresses, and if an individual,
such individual's citizenship, of any such other person;
(iii) The extent to which each such other person is supervised, directed,
owned, controlled, financed, or subsidized, in whole or in part, by any
government of a foreign country or foreign political party or by any other
foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization;
and
(iv) The nature and amount of contributions, income, money, or thing of
value, if any, that the registrant has received during the preceding one
hundred eighty days from each such other person in connection with any of the
activities referred to in subdivision (1)(f)(i) of this section, either as
compensation or for disbursement or otherwise, and the form and time of each
such payment and from whom received;
(g)(i) A detailed statement of the money and other things of value spent
or disposed of by the registrant during the preceding one hundred eighty days
in furtherance of or in connection with activities that require registration
under this section and that have been undertaken by the registrant either as an
agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist
organization, for the registrant, or for any other person or in connection with
any activities relating to the registrant becoming an agent of such principal;
and
(ii) A detailed statement of any contributions of money or other things of
value made by the registrant during the preceding one hundred eighty days,
other than contributions prohibited under 52 U.S.C. 30121, as such section
existed on April 1, 2025, in connection with an election to any political
office or in connection with any primary election, convention, or caucus held
to select candidates for any political office;
(h) Copies of each written agreement and the terms and conditions of each
oral agreement, including all modifications of such agreements, or, if no
agreement exists, a full statement of all the circumstances, by reason of which
the registrant is performing, assuming or purporting to perform, directing
others to perform, or has agreed to perform for the registrant, for a foreign
principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization, or for
any other person, any activities that require registration under this section;
(i) Such other statements, information, or documents pertinent to the
purposes of this subsection as the Attorney General, having due regard for the
national security and the public interest, may from time to time require; and
(j) Such further statements and such further copies of documents as are
necessary to make the statements made in the registration statement and
supplements to such statement, and the copies of documents furnished therewith,
not misleading.
(2) Every agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a
foreign terrorist organization who has filed a registration statement required
by subsection (1) of this section shall, within thirty days after the
expiration of each period of six months succeeding such filing, file with the
Attorney General a supplement to such statement under oath, on a form
prescribed by the Attorney General. Such statement shall set forth, with
respect to such preceding six-month period, such facts as the Attorney General,
having due regard for the national security and the public interest, deems
necessary to make the information required under this section accurate,
complete, and current with respect to such six-month period. In connection with
the information furnished under subdivisions (1)(c), (d), (f)(i), and (h) of
this section, the registrant shall give notice to the Attorney General of any
change therein within ten days after such change occurs. If the Attorney
General, having due regard for the national security and the public interest,
determines that it is necessary to carry out the purposes of the Foreign
-4-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act, the Attorney General may, in
any particular case, require supplements to the registration statement to be
filed at more frequent intervals with respect to all or particular items of
information to be furnished.
(3) The registration statement and supplements to such statement shall be
executed under oath as follows:
(a) If the registrant is an individual, by such individual;
(b) If the registrant is a partnership, by the majority of the partners
thereof; and
(c) If the registrant is a person other than an individual or a
partnership, by a majority of the officers thereof or persons performing the
functions of officers or by a majority of the board of directors thereof or
persons performing the functions of directors, if any.
(4) The fact that a registration statement or supplement has been filed
shall not:
(a) Necessarily be deemed full compliance with the Foreign Adversary and
Terrorist Agent Registration Act and the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated under the act on the part of the registrant;
(b) Indicate that the Attorney General has in any way passed upon the
merits of such statement or supplement; or
(c) Preclude liability for willfully:
(i) Failing to file a registration statement or supplement when due; or
(ii) Making a false statement of a material fact in such statement,
supplement, or any other document filed with or furnished to the Attorney
General under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act.
(5) If any agent of a foreign principal required to register under the
Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act has previously
registered with the Attorney General under the act, the Attorney General, in
order to eliminate inappropriate duplication, may permit the incorporation by
reference in the registration statement or supplements of any information or
documents previously filed by such agent.
Sec. 5. (1) Section 4 of this act shall not apply to the following agents
of foreign principals:
(a) A duly accredited diplomatic or consular officer of a foreign
government who is so recognized by the United States Department of State, while
such officer is engaged exclusively in activities that are recognized by the
United States Department of State as being within the scope of the functions of
such officer;
(b) Any official of a foreign government, if such government is recognized
by the United States, who is not a public relations counsel, publicity agent,
information service employee, or a citizen of the United States, whose name and
status and the character of whose duties as such official are of public record
in the United States Department of State, while such official is engaged
exclusively in activities that are recognized by the United States Department
of State as being within the scope of the functions of such official;
(c) Any member of the staff of, or any person employed by, a duly
accredited diplomatic or consular officer of a foreign government who is so
recognized by the United States Department of State, other than a public
relations counsel, publicity agent, or information service employee, whose name
and status and the character of whose duties as such member or employee are of
public record in the United States Department of State, while such member or
employee is engaged exclusively in the performance of activities that are
recognized by the United States Department of State as being within the scope
of the functions of such member or employee;
(d) Any person qualified to practice law in the State of Nebraska, insofar
as such person engages or agrees to engage in the legal representation of a
foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization
before any state or federal court or agency or any agency of a political
subdivision of this state, except that for the purposes of the Foreign
Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act, legal representation does not
include attempts to influence or persuade agency personnel or officials other
than in the course of judicial proceedings, criminal or civil law enforcement
inquiries, investigations, or proceedings, or agency proceedings required by
statute or regulation to be conducted on the record; or
(e) Any person who advocates on behalf of an individual for individualized
immigration relief.
(2) No person acting as an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary
nation or a foreign terrorist organization shall subcontract for services for
activities regulated under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent
Registration Act requiring registration as an agent of a foreign principal, or
otherwise induce another person to carry out activities that are so regulated
under the act unless such person fully informs all parties of their status as
such an agent. The requirements of this subsection apply to any person carrying
out services or activities regulated under the act requiring registration as an
agent of a foreign principal.
Sec. 6. (1) Every person within the State of Nebraska who is an agent of
a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist
organization and who is required to register under the Foreign Adversary and
Terrorist Agent Registration Act and who transmits or causes to be transmitted
in the United States mail, through digital communication, or by any means or
instrumentality of interstate or foreign commerce any informational materials
for, or in the interests of, such foreign principal in the form of prints or in
any other form that is reasonably adapted to being, that such person believes
-5-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
will be, or that such person intends to be, disseminated or circulated among
two or more persons shall, not later than forty-eight hours after the beginning
of the transmittal thereof, file with the Attorney General two copies thereof.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any person within the State of Nebraska who
is an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign
terrorist organization and required to register under the Foreign Adversary and
Terrorist Agent Registration Act to transmit or cause to be transmitted in the
United States mail, through digital communication, or by any means or
instrumentality of interstate or foreign commerce any informational materials
for, or in the interests of, such foreign principal without placing in such
informational materials a conspicuous statement that the materials are
distributed by the agent on behalf of such foreign principal, and that
additional information is on file with the Attorney General. The Attorney
General may by rule and regulation define what constitutes a conspicuous
statement for the purposes of this section.
(3) The copies of informational materials required by this section to be
filed with the Attorney General shall be available for public inspection under
such rules and regulations as the Attorney General may adopt and promulgate.
(4) It shall be unlawful for any person within the State of Nebraska who
is an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign
terrorist organization required to register under the Foreign Adversary and
Terrorist Agent Registration Act to transmit, convey, or otherwise furnish to
any agency or official of the state, including any agency or official of a
political subdivision of the state, for or in the interests of such foreign
principal, any political propaganda, or to request from any such agency or
official for, or in the interests of, such foreign principal, any information
or advice with respect to any matter pertaining to the political or public
interests, policies, or relations of an adversary nation, a foreign terrorist
organization, or a political party from an adversary nation or a foreign
terrorist organization, or pertaining to the foreign or domestic policies of
the United States or the State of Nebraska, unless the propaganda or the
request is prefaced or accompanied by a true and accurate statement to the
effect that such person is registered as an agent of such foreign principal
under the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act.
(5) Whenever any agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or
a foreign terrorist organization required to register under the Foreign
Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act appears before any committee of
the Legislature or a local government to testify for, or in the interests of,
such foreign principal, such agent shall, at the time of such appearance,
furnish the committee with a copy of such agent's most recent registration
statement filed with the Attorney General for inclusion in the records of the
committee as part of such agent's testimony.
Sec. 7. (1) Every person who is an agent of a foreign principal from an
adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization registered under the
Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act shall keep and preserve,
while such person is such an agent, such books of account and other records
with respect to all activities, the disclosure of which is required under the
act, in accordance with such business and accounting practices, as the Attorney
General, having due regard for the national security and the public interest,
may by rule and regulation require as necessary or appropriate for the
enforcement of the act and shall preserve such records for a period of three
years following the termination of such status. Until rules and regulations are
in effect under this section, every agent of a foreign principal from an
adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization shall keep books of
account and shall preserve all written records with respect to such agent's
activities. Such books and records shall be open at all reasonable times to the
inspection of any official charged with the enforcement of the act.
(2) No person shall willfully (a) conceal, destroy, obliterate, mutilate,
or falsify, any book or record that is required to be kept under the act, (b)
attempt such conduct, or (c) cause such conduct to be done.
Sec. 8. (1) The Attorney General shall retain in permanent form one copy
of each registration statement furnished under the Foreign Adversary and
Terrorist Agent Registration Act, and such statement shall be a public record
and open to public examination and inspection at such reasonable hours, under
such rules and regulations as the Attorney General may adopt and promulgate.
(2) The Attorney General shall, upon receipt, promptly transmit one copy
of any registration statement filed, and one copy of every amendment or
supplement to such statement filed, to the United States Secretary of State for
such comment and use as the secretary may determine to be appropriate from the
point of view of the foreign relations of the United States. Failure of the
Attorney General to transmit such copy shall not be a bar to prosecution under
the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act.
(3) The Attorney General may furnish information obtained by the Attorney
General in the administration of the act to state and federal agencies and to
committees of the Legislature. The Attorney General may furnish such
information as may be appropriate in light of the purposes of the act. This
includes, but is not limited to, the names of registrants under the act, copies
of registration statements, or parts thereof, and other documents or
information filed under the act.
(4) The Attorney General shall report to the Legislature every six months
concerning administration of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent
Registration Act, including registrations filed pursuant to the act, and the
nature, sources, and content of political propaganda disseminated and
-6-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
distributed.
(5) The Attorney General shall post a monthly report on the portal
described in section 12 of this act concerning administration of the Foreign
Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act, including registrations filed
pursuant to the act, and the nature, sources, and content of political
propaganda disseminated and distributed.
Sec. 9. For an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a
foreign terrorist organization that is not an individual, each officer or
director of such agent or person performing the functions of an officer or a
director shall cause such agent to execute and file a registration statement
and supplements to such statement as and when such filing is required under
section 4 of this act and shall also cause such agent to comply with sections 6
and 7 of this act and all other requirements of the Foreign Adversary and
Terrorist Agent Registration Act. Dissolution of any organization acting as an
agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist
organization shall not relieve any such agent from complying with this section.
In case of the failure of any such agent to comply with any of the requirements
of the act, each of such agent's officers, directors, or persons performing the
functions of officers or directors shall be subject to prosecution under the
act.
Sec. 10. (1)(a) A person shall not:
(i) Willfully violate any provision of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist
Agent Registration Act or any rule or regulation under the act; or
(ii) In any registration statement, supplement to such statement, or any
other document filed with or furnished to the Attorney General under the act,
willfully make a false statement of a material fact.
(b) A person who violates this subsection shall be subject to a civil
penalty of up to fifty thousand dollars. The total civil penalties a person may
be required to pay under this subsection shall not exceed fifty thousand
dollars for any violations occurring in the same calendar year. All penalties
collected under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of
Nebraska.
(2) If a person found to be in violation of subsection (1) of this section
is a student, a faculty member, a researcher, or an adjunct or is otherwise
employed by or associated with a postsecondary educational institution, such
person may be expelled or dismissed from any role with any postsecondary
educational institution in Nebraska and may be prohibited from entering any
campus of such an institution in this state. It shall be the purview of the
postsecondary educational institution to establish appropriate responses to
violations of subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Each postsecondary educational institution in Nebraska shall adopt a
policy regarding any permanent expulsion and dismissal of persons found to be
in violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(4) In any proceeding under the act brought by the Attorney General in
which it is alleged that a person is an agent of a foreign principal from an
adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization, the specific identity of
the principal shall be alleged and it shall be the burden of the Attorney
General to prove such identity.
(5) Failure to file any registration statement or supplements to such
statement as required by section 4 of this act shall be considered a continuing
violation for as long as such failure exists, notwithstanding any statute of
limitation or other statute to the contrary.
(6) Whenever, in the judgment of the Attorney General, any person has
engaged in any act or practice that constitutes a violation of the Foreign
Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act or any rule or regulation under
the act, the Attorney General may apply to the district court for an order
enjoining such acts or practices or for an order directing compliance. Upon a
showing by the Attorney General that such person has engaged in any such acts
or practices, the court may issue a temporary or permanent injunction,
restraining order, or such other order that it may deem proper.
(7) If the Attorney General determines that a registration statement does
not comply with the requirements of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent
Registration Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the
act, the Attorney General shall notify the registrant in writing, specifying in
what respects the statement is deficient. No person shall act as an agent of a
foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization
at any time ten days or more after receipt of such notification without filing
an amended registration statement in full compliance with the requirements of
the act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act.
(8) It shall be unlawful for any agent of a foreign principal from an
adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization required to register under
the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act to be a party to any
contract, agreement, or understanding, either express or implied, with such
foreign principal pursuant to which the amount or payment of the compensation,
fee, or other remuneration of such agent is contingent, in whole or in part,
upon the success of any political activities carried on by such agent.
Sec. 11. (1) All businesses and nonprofit organizations operating within
the State of Nebraska shall attest that they are cognizant of and in compliance
with the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act.
(2) The attestation required by this section shall be filed as follows:
(a) For a domestic or foreign limited liability company, the attestation
shall be included in the biennial report in each odd-numbered year under
-7-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
section 21-125;
(b) For a domestic or foreign corporation subject to the Nebraska Model
Business Corporation Act, the attestation shall be included in the biennial
report in each even-numbered year under section 21-301 or 21-304;
(c) For a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation, the attestation shall
be included in the biennial report in each odd-numbered year under section
21-19,172;
(d) For a domestic or foreign limited liability partnership, the
attestation shall be included in the annual report under section 67-456;
(e) For banking, insurance, and building and loan association corporations
paying fees and making reports to the Director of Insurance or the Director of
Banking and Finance, the attestation shall be included on a report filed with
the Director of Insurance or the Director of Banking and Finance. Each director
shall determine the frequency with which such reports must be filed but shall
not require a report to be filed more frequently than on an annual basis; and
(f) For any other business or nonprofit organization not described in
subdivisions (2)(a) through (e) of this section, the attestation shall be
included on the annual or biennial report submitted to the Secretary of State
as required by the organic law of the business or nonprofit organization.
(3) The Attorney General shall develop the attestation required by this
section in consultation with the Secretary of State.
(4) The Secretary of State may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to carry out this section.
(5) An unincorporated entity that is of a type that is not created by
filing a public organic document with the Secretary of State is exempt from
this section.
Sec. 12. (1) In order to increase public transparency, the Attorney
General shall provide information about agents of foreign principals registered
in Nebraska on a portal of the Attorney General's website. The portal shall
contain the information about each registrant and each registrant's activities
within the State of Nebraska.
(2) The Attorney General may exchange data with government officials in
other states and the federal government in order to increase the transparency
and registration compliance of foreign principals from adversary nations or
foreign terrorist organizations that operate in multiple states.
Sec. 13. (1) In order to ensure compliance with the Foreign Adversary and
Terrorist Agent Registration Act, if the Attorney General has reasonable cause
to believe that any person has engaged in or is engaging in any act or practice
in violation of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act, the
Attorney General shall have the power to issue civil investigative demands to
persons suspected of being agents of foreign principals from adversary nations
or foreign terrorist organizations.
(2) The Attorney General may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the act.
(3) In conducting investigations of potential violations of the Foreign
Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act and in enforcing the act, the
Attorney General shall not infringe upon the protections set forth in the
Personal Privacy Protection Act.
Sec. 14. Sections 14 to 21 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Crush Transnational Repression in Nebraska Act.
Sec. 15. The purpose of the Crush Transnational Repression in Nebraska
Act is to counter the threat and practice of transnational repression committed
by foreign governments or foreign terrorist organizations against the citizens
and residents of this state, and to counter the threat and practice of foreign
government interstate harassment through extranational enforcement of foreign
government laws and directives.
Sec. 16. For purposes of the Crush Transnational Repression in Nebraska
Act:
(1) Agent of a foreign principal means an agent directed or controlled by
a foreign principal, or the proxies of such agent;
(2) Foreign adversary means a foreign adversary as determined pursuant to
15 C.F.R. 791.4 as such regulation existed on April 1, 2025;
(3) Foreign political party means any organization or any other
combination of individuals in a country other than the United States, or any
unit or branch thereof, having for an aim or purpose, or that is engaged in any
activity devoted in whole or in part to:
(a) The establishment, administration, control, or acquisition of
administration or control, of a government of a foreign country or a
subdivision thereof; or
(b) The furtherance or influencing of the political or public interests,
policies, or relations of a government of a foreign country or a subdivision
thereof;
(4) Foreign principal means:
(a) The government of a foreign country or any official or subdivision of
such government;
(b) A foreign political party or any member or subdivision of such party;
(c) A foreign terrorist organization or any member or subdivision of such
organization;
(d) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other
combination of persons that is:
(i) Organized under the laws of, or has its principal place of business
in, a foreign adversary, or a subsidiary of such entity; or
(ii) Owned or controlled wholly or in part by any person or combination of
-8-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
persons of a foreign adversary or foreign terrorist organization; or
(e) Any entity that is owned or controlled in whole or in part by a person
or entity described in subdivision (4)(a), (b), (c), or (d) of this section;
(5) Foreign terrorist organization means an organization included on the
United States Department of State's list of designated foreign terrorist
organizations pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1189, as such section existed on April 1,
2025;
(6)(a) Government of a foreign country means any person or group of
persons exercising sovereign de facto or de jure political jurisdiction over
any country, other than the United States, or over any part of such country,
and includes any subdivision of any such group and any group or agency to which
such sovereign de facto or de jure authority or functions are directly or
indirectly delegated.
(b) Government of a foreign country also includes any faction or body of
insurgents within a country, other than the United States, assuming to exercise
governmental authority whether such faction or body of insurgents has or has
not been recognized by the United States; and
(7) Transnational repression includes actions and behaviors emanating from
or attributable to a foreign principal committed by an agent of such foreign
principal, acting outside or within the foreign principal's territory, with the
intention of harassing, intimidating, censoring, or otherwise extending such
principal's ability to influence, control, or impose such principal's
preferences on the behavior of individuals outside of the principal's territory
or jurisdiction. Such actions and behaviors include direct and indirect
methods, including physical contact, threats, electronic targeting, actual or
credible threats of collective punishment or harassment of individuals under
the principal's effective control, financial coercion, abuse of administrative
processes, selective prosecution of laws of general application, or the use or
direction of social media and telecommunications entities.
Sec. 17. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Covered offense means:
(i) Assault in the first degree, section 28-308;
(ii) Assault in the second degree, section 28-309;
(iii) Assault in the third degree, section 28-310;
(iv) Terroristic threats, section 28-311.01;
(v) Stalking, section 28-311.03;
(vi) Violation of a harassment protection order, section 28-311.09;
(vii) False imprisonment in the first degree, section 28-314;
(viii) False imprisonment in the second degree, section 28-315; and
(ix) Attempt, conspiracy, solicitation, being an accessory to, aiding and
abetting, aiding the consummation of, or compounding a felony with any of the
other offenses in subdivision (1)(a) of this section as the underlying offense;
and
(b) Protected conduct means conduct that is lawful under local, state, and
federal law and consists of:
(i) The free exercise of religion;
(ii) Speech, orally or in writing in print or digital form, on a matter of
public interest or concern;
(iii) Petitioning any local, state, or federal government entity for
redress of grievances; or
(iv) Peaceably assembling.
(2) Any person who commits a covered offense shall be punished by the
imposition of the next higher penalty classification than the penalty
classification prescribed for the covered offense if:
(a) The person committing the offense is an agent of a foreign principal
who acts knowingly at the direction of, on behalf of, or under the influence of
such foreign principal; and
(b) The person committed the offense with the intent to:
(i) Coerce another person to act on behalf of a foreign principal;
(ii) Coerce another person to leave the United States or cause another
person to leave the United States;
(iii) Cause another person to forebear from engaging in protected conduct;
or
(iv) Retaliate against another person for engaging in protected conduct.
(3) If an offense is punishable as a Class I misdemeanor, the enhanced
penalty under this section is a Class IV felony.
(4) The allegations supporting an enhancement under this section shall be
set forth in the indictment or information, and it shall be the burden of the
prosecuting attorney to prove such allegations beyond a reasonable doubt to the
judge or jury in the state's case in chief.
Sec. 18. (1) A person commits an offense if, while acting as the agent of
a foreign principal, such person:
(a) Intentionally engages in the prevention, detection, investigation,
monitoring, surveilling, or prosecution of an offense under the law or rule of
a government of a foreign country or a foreign terrorist organization at the
direction of such foreign principal, government, or organization; and
(b) Such person acts without the knowledge and approval of the appropriate
state or federal law enforcement agency of the United States.
(2) A violation of this section is a Class IIA felony.
Sec. 19. The Nebraska State Patrol may prepare or commission an empirical
and qualitative report on the threat of transnational repression in Nebraska
and electronically submit such report to the Legislature.
Sec. 20. (1) The Nebraska State Patrol may develop a transnational
-9-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
repression recognition and response training. The training may be regularly
updated to address emerging threats and specific information on tactics used by
specific foreign principals.
(2) Such training may include:
(a) How to identify different tactics of transnational repression in
physical and nonphysical forms;
(b) Those foreign principals that are known to employ transnational
repression, including not only those who use it most frequently, but also those
who use it most egregiously, including, but not limited to, tools of digital
surveillance and other Internet-based tools frequently used to carry out
transnational repression activities;
(c) Best practices for appropriate local and state law enforcement
prevention, reporting, and response tactics; and
(d) Information about communities targeted by transnational repression and
propaganda that may be perpetuated by foreign principals.
Sec. 21. (1) The Nebraska State Patrol may develop a centralized and
convenient website that allows members of the public to report instances of
transnational repression. The website may include options for reporting in
languages commonly spoken in Nebraska, including particularly languages of
communities affected more frequently by transnational repression.
(2) The patrol may conduct a public awareness campaign to inform the
public:
(a) How to identify and report instances of transnational repression;
(b) How to use the website created under this section; and
(c) What tools and remedies are available for victims of transnational
repression.
(3) The patrol may electronically submit reports to the Legislature
concerning complaints received on the website, outcomes of such complaints, and
any instances of interference by foreign principals in the reporting process.
Sec. 22. Section 49-1480, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-1480 (1) Every person employed, retained, or authorized as a lobbyist
shall, before commencing any lobbying activity:
(a) File , file an application with the Clerk of the Legislature for
registration as a lobbyist, and if the clerk is satisfied that the application
has been properly prepared the registration shall be deemed to be complete. The
application shall be on a form prescribed by the clerk and approved by the
Executive Board of the Legislative Council, and shall include as a minimum the
following:
(i) (1) The name, permanent residence address, and office address of the
lobbyist;
(ii) (2) The name and address of the principal of such lobbyist;
(iii) (3) The nature of the business of such principal and the amounts or
sums given or to be given the lobbyist as compensation or reimbursement for
lobbying. A lobbyist who is salaried or retained by a principal need only
report that portion of compensation or reimbursement reasonably attributable to
lobbying;
(iv) (4) A description of the business activity of the lobbyist;
(v) (5) An identification of the matters on which the principal or
lobbyist expects to lobby;
(vi) If the principal is a Chinese military company, an affirmative
acknowledgment by the lobbyist that such lobbyist is lobbying on behalf of, and
thereby acting as an agent of, a foreign adversary of the United States;
(vii) (6) If the principal is an industry, trade, or professional
association, a specific description of the industry, trade, or profession
represented by the principal and the names and addresses of its officers;
(viii) (7) If the principal is not an industry, trade, or professional
association, a specific description of the interests and groups represented by
the principal and the names and addresses of its officers; and
(ix) (8) The name and address of any official in the legislative or
executive branch, and of any members of any such official's staff or immediate
family, who are employed by the lobbyist or any person acting on behalf of such
lobbyist if such information is known or reasonably should have been known to
the lobbyist.
(b) If any such lobbying activity is on behalf of a Chinese military
company, disclose that such Chinese military company is a foreign adversary of
the United States. For purposes of this subdivision (b), lobbying activity
includes, but is not limited to, lobbying by means of telephone, electronic
mail, United States mail or other mail delivery service, in-person meetings, or
testimony at legislative hearings.
(2)(a) Every person employed, retained, or authorized as a consultant for
a Chinese military company shall, before commencing any influencing activity in
Nebraska for such Chinese military company:
(i) File with the commission, on a form prescribed by the commission,
information that shall include as a minimum, the following:
(A) The name, permanent residence address, and office address of the
consultant;
(B) The name and address of the Chinese military company represented by
such consultant;
(C) A description of the business activity of the consultant;
(D) An identification of the matters on which the consultant expects to
conduct influencing activity on behalf of such Chinese military company;
(E) An affirmative acknowledgment by the consultant that such consultant
-10-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
is influencing on behalf of, and thereby acting as an agent of, a foreign
adversary of the United States; and
(F) The name and address of any official in the legislative or executive
branch, and of any members of any such official's staff or immediate family,
who are employed by the consultant or any person acting on behalf of such
consultant if such information is known or reasonably should have been known to
the consultant; and
(ii) Disclose that such Chinese military company is a foreign adversary of
the United States.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, influencing activity includes, but is
not limited to, influencing by means of telephone, electronic mail, United
States mail or other mail delivery service, or in-person meetings.
(3) Any person who violates subdivision (1)(a)(vi) or (1)(b) or subsection
(2) of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of one hundred thousand
dollars for each violation. For any subsequent violation, the civil penalty
shall be increased by one hundred thousand dollars more than the previously
assessed penalty, not to exceed one million dollars per violation. All
penalties collected under this section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution
of Nebraska.
(4) For purposes of this section, Chinese military company has the same
meaning as in section 1260H of Public Law 116-283, as such section existed on
April 1, 2025, and includes any subsidiary of a Chinese military company or any
company owned or controlled, in whole or in part, by a Chinese military
company.
Sec. 23. Section 49-1496, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
49-1496 (1) The statement of financial interests filed pursuant to
sections 49-1493 to 49-14,104 shall be on a form prescribed by the commission.
(2) Individuals required to file under sections 49-1493 to 49-1495 shall
file the following information for themselves:
(a) The name and address of and the nature of association with any
business with which the individual was associated;
(b) The name and address of any entity in which a position of trustee was
held;
(c) The name, address, and nature of business of a person or government
body from whom any income in the value of one thousand dollars or more was
received and the nature of the services rendered, except that the
identification of patrons, customers, patients, or clients of such person from
which employment income was received is not required;
(d) A description, but not the value, of the following, if the fair market
value thereof exceeded one thousand dollars:
(i) The nature and location of all real property in the state, except any
such real property used as a residence of the individual;
(ii) The depository of checking and savings accounts;
(iii) The issuer of stocks, bonds, and government securities; and
(iv) A description of all other property owned or held for the production
of income, except property owned or used by a business with which the
individual was associated;
(e) The name and address of each creditor to whom the value of one
thousand dollars or more was owed or guaranteed by the individual or a member
of the individual's immediate family, except for the following:
(i) Accounts payable;
(ii) Debts arising out of retail installment transactions;
(iii) Loans made by financial institutions in the ordinary course of
business;
(iv) Loans from a relative; and
(v) Land contracts that have been properly recorded with the county clerk
or the register of deeds;
(f) The name, address, and occupation or nature of business of any person
from whom a gift in the value of more than one hundred dollars was received, a
description of the gift and the circumstances of the gift, and the monetary
value category of the gift, based on a good faith estimate by the individual,
reported in the following categories:
(i) $100.01 - $200;
(ii) $200.01 - $500;
(iii) $500.01 - $1,000; and
(iv) $1,000.01 or more; and
(g) An attestation that the individual is not an agent of a foreign
principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization, as such
terms are defined in the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration
Act. Such attestation shall be made by checking a box on the form attesting to
such fact; and
(h) (g) Such other information as the individual or the commission deems
necessary, after notice and hearing, to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska
Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.
Sec. 24. Section 49-14,126, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-14,126 (1) The commission, upon finding that there has been a violation
of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act or any rule or
regulation promulgated thereunder, may issue an order requiring the violator to
do one or more of the following:
(a) (1) Cease and desist from the violation;
-11-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
(b) (2) File any report, statement, or other information as required;
(c) (3) Pay a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars for
each violation of the act, rule, or regulation; or
(d) (4) Pay the costs of the hearing in a contested case if the violator
did not appear at the hearing personally or by counsel.
(2) Upon finding that there has been a violation of subdivision (1)(a)(vi)
or (1)(b) or subsection (2) of section 49-1480, the commission shall issue an
order paying any person who provided the commission information that resulted
in the finding of such violation a sum of fifty thousand dollars. Such payment
shall be contingent upon the commission recovering any civil penalty sought
under subsection (3) of section 49-1480.
Sec. 25. Section 49-14,140, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-14,140 The Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash Fund
is hereby created. The fund shall consist of funds received by the commission
pursuant to sections 49-1449.01, 49-1470, 49-1480.01, 49-1482, 49-14,123, and
49-14,123.01 and subdivision (1)(d) (4) of section 49-14,126. The fund shall be
used by the commission in administering the Nebraska Political Accountability
and Disclosure Act. Any money in the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure
Commission Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
On April 25, 2013, the State Treasurer shall transfer $630,870 from the
Campaign Finance Limitation Cash Fund to the Nebraska Accountability and
Disclosure Commission Cash Fund to be used for development, implementation, and
maintenance of an electronic filing system for campaign statements and other
reports under the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act and for
making such statements and reports available to the public on the website of
the commission. The State Treasurer shall transfer the balance of the Campaign
Finance Limitation Cash Fund to the Election Administration Fund on or before
July 5, 2013, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible.
Sec. 26. Section 73-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
73-901 Sections 73-901 to 73-907 and section 30 of this act shall be known
and may be cited as the Foreign Adversary Contracting Prohibition Act.
Sec. 27. Section 73-903, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
73-903 For purposes of the Foreign Adversary Contracting Prohibition Act:
(1) Company means any sole proprietorship, organization, association,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, limited liability company, or other entity or business association
that exists for the purpose of making a profit, including all wholly owned
subsidiaries, majority owned subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of
any such entity or business association;
(2) Foreign adversary means a foreign adversary as determined pursuant to
15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on April 1, 2025 7.4;
(3) Owned in whole or in part means:
(a) For a publicly traded company, any share of ownership that entails the
ability to direct or influence the operations of the company, the ability to
appoint or discharge any board members, officers, or directors, or any other
rights beyond those available to a retail investor holding an equivalent share
of ownership; and
(b) For a privately held company, any share of ownership;
(4) Public entity means the state or any department, agency, commission,
or other body of state government, including publicly funded institutions of
higher education, any political subdivision of the state, and any other public
or private agency, person, partnership, corporation, or business entity acting
on behalf of any such public entity;
(5) Scrutinized company means:
(a) Any company organized under the laws of a foreign adversary or having
its principal place of business within a foreign adversary, and any subsidiary
of any such company;
(b) Any company owned in whole or in part or operated by the government of
a foreign adversary, an entity controlled by the government of a foreign
adversary, or any subsidiary or parent of any such company; or
(c) Any company that sells to a public entity a final technology-related
product or service that originates with a company described in subdivision (5)
(a) or (b) of this section without incorporating that product or service into
another final product or service; and
(6) Technology-related product or service means a product or service used
for information systems, surveillance, light detection and ranging, or
communications. The term does not include unmanned aerial systems; and
(7) Unmanned aerial system means a powered, aerial vehicle that:
(a) Does not carry a human operator and is operated without the
possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft;
(b) Uses aerodynamic forces to provide vehicle lift;
(c) Can fly autonomously or be piloted remotely; and
(d) Can be expendable or recoverable.
Sec. 28. Section 73-905, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
73-905 (1) A public entity shall require a company that submits a bid or
proposal or enters into any contract or contract renewal with any public entity
-12-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
for any technology-related product or service to certify:
(a) (1) That the company is not a scrutinized company;
(b) (2) That the company will not subcontract with any scrutinized company
for any aspect of performance of the contemplated contract; and
(c) (3) That any products or services to be provided do not originate with
a scrutinized company.
(2) This section shall not apply to the contracts described in section 30
of this act.
Sec. 29. Section 73-906, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
73-906 (1) No public entity shall enter into any contract or contract
renewal that would result in any state or local government funds being
transferred:
(1) (a) To a scrutinized company in connection with any technology-related
product or service; or
(2) (b) To any company in connection with any technology-related product
or service that originates with a scrutinized company.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a public entity may
enter into a contract for goods manufactured by a scrutinized company if:
(a)(i) There is no other reasonable option for procuring such good;
(ii) The contract is preapproved by the Department of Administrative
Services; and
(iii) Not procuring such good would pose a greater threat to the state
than the threat associated with the good itself; or
(b) The purchasing entity is an electric supplier that is not out of
compliance with the Critical Infrastructure Protection requirements issued by
the North American Electric Reliability Corporation.
Sec. 30. Notwithstanding sections 73-904 and 73-906, a public entity may
enter into a contract for goods manufactured by a scrutinized company if:
(1)(a) There is no other reasonable option for procuring such goods;
(b) The contract is preapproved by the Department of Administrative
Services; and
(c) Not procuring such good would pose a greater threat to the state than
the threat associated with the good itself; or
(2) The purchasing entity is an electric supplier that is not out of
compliance with the Critical Infrastructure Protection requirements issued by
the North American Electric Reliability Corporation.
Sec. 31. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Company means any corporation, partnership, association, organization,
or other combination of persons;
(b) Foreign adversary means those countries listed in 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as
such regulation existed on April 1, 2025;
(c) Foreign adversarial company means a company that:
(i) Is organized under the laws of a foreign adversary;
(ii) Has its principal place of business within a foreign adversary;
(iii) Is owned in whole or in part, operated, or controlled by the
government of a foreign adversary; or
(iv) Is a subsidiary or parent of any company otherwise described in
subdivision (1)(c) of this section; and
(d) Government of a foreign adversary means any person or group of persons
exercising sovereign de facto or de jure political jurisdiction over any
foreign adversary, or over any part of such country, and includes any
subdivision of any such group and any group or agency to which such sovereign
de facto or de jure authority or functions are directly or indirectly
delegated. Such term shall include any faction or body of insurgents within a
country assuming to exercise governmental authority whether such faction or
body of insurgents has or has not been recognized by the United States.
(2) A foreign adversarial company shall be ineligible to receive any
benefits under an incentive program of the State of Nebraska, including under:
(a) The Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act;
(b) The ImagiNE Nebraska Act;
(c) The Nebraska Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act;
(d) The Nebraska Advantage Research and Development Act;
(e) The Nebraska Advantage Rural Development Act;
(f) The Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act;
(g) The New Markets Job Growth Investment Act;
(h) The Urban Redevelopment Act; and
(i) Any other tax or other incentive program created by legislative or
executive action for the purpose of recruitment or retention of businesses in
Nebraska.
Sec. 32. For purposes of sections 32 to 35 of this act:
(1) Business means any:
(a) Sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation,
partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership,
or limited liability business, including a wholly owned subsidiary, majority-
owned subsidiary, parent business, or affiliate of those entities or business
associations that exists to make a profit; and
(b) Nonprofit organization;
(2) Domicile means the country where:
(a) A business is registered and headquartered;
(b) A business primarily completes its affairs; and
(c) The majority stake of ownership of a business is located;
(3) Foreign adversary means any foreign government specified in federal
-13-

LB644 LB644
2025 2025
code 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on April 1, 2025;
(4) Genetic sequencer means any device or platform used to conduct genetic
sequencing, resequencing, isolation, or other genetic research;
(5) Genetic sequencing means any method used to determine the identity and
order of nucleotide bases in the human genome;
(6) Human genome means deoxyribonucleic acid or ribonucleic acid found in
human cells;
(7) Medical facility means a facility that provides any health service
and:
(a) Receives any money from the State of Nebraska or the United States
Government;
(b) Is registered with the State of Nebraska to provide any health care
service; or
(c) Conducts research or testing on, with, or relating to genetic
sequencing or the human genome;
(8) Operational and research software means any computer program used for
any operation, control, analysis, or other necessary function of genetic
sequencing or genetic sequencers;
(9) Research facility means a facility that conducts research on, with, or
relating to genetic sequencing or the human genome; and
(10) Software means any program, routine, or set of one or more programs
or routines that is used or intended for use to cause the performance of a task
or set of tasks relating to genetic sequencing or genetic sequencers by any
computer, computer-related peripheral equipment, or combination thereof.
Sec. 33. No medical facility or research facility shall use any genetic
sequencer or operational and research software for genetic sequencing if such
genetic sequencer or operational and research software is produced in or by
any:
(1) Foreign adversary;
(2) State-owned enterprise of any foreign adversary;
(3) Business domiciled in any foreign adversary; or
(4) Subsidiary or affiliate of a business domiciled in any foreign
adversary.
Sec. 34. Any medical facility or research facility that is in possession
of any genetic sequencer or operational and research software that is described
in section 33 of this act shall:
(1) Permanently disable such genetic sequencer or operational and research
software; or
(2) Remove such genetic sequencer or operational and research software
from any facility associated with such medical facility or research facility.
Sec. 35. (1) Any genetic sequencing data that is utilized in the State of
Nebraska shall not be stored within any foreign adversary country.
(2) No person shall remotely access genetic sequencing data that is stored
in the State of Nebraska from a foreign adversary country.
Sec. 36. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 37. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect the
validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 38. Original sections 49-1480, 49-14,126, and 49-14,140, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 49-1496, 73-901, 73-903, 73-905, and
73-906, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-14-